Hawaii statutes.
§174-1 Findings and declaration of
necessity. It is hereby found that it is important to the welfare of the
people of Hawaii that the overall economy of the State including but not
limited to agricultural production, be developed as fully as possible. It is
further found that water presently tapped for consumption is inadequate for the
fullest development of the economy of the State. It is therefore hereby
declared that additional land and water facilities are necessary for the
development of the overall economy of the State.

It is the intent of the legislature that no
project under this chapter shall be organized in the city and county of
Honolulu or other counties without the board of land and natural resources
first consulting the board of water supply of the city and county of Honolulu
or the water board or department of each county. [L 1961, c 166, pt of §3;
Supp, §86-1; HRS §174-1; am L 1987, c 306, §3]

Cross References

Irrigation and water utilization projects, see chapter 168.

Irrigation water development, see chapter 167.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next